Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2632
Venue.

Unless otherwise provided in the Nebraska
Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, venue for
proceedings under this part is:

(1) In the place in this state where the person to be protected
resides whether or not a guardian has been appointed in another place; or

(2) If the person to be protected does not reside in this
state, in any place where he or
she has property.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 250, UPC § 5-403;

Laws 2011, LB157, § 42.

Nebraska Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, see section 30-3901.